North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116B. Escheats and Abandoned Property.
Article 4. North Carolina Unclaimed Property Act.
§ 116B-62.
Preparation of list of owners by Treasurer.

There shall be delivered annually in an electronic format to the Administrative Office of the Courts to be distributed to the clerk of superior court of each county a list prepared by the Treasurer of escheated and abandoned property reported to the Treasurer. The list shall contain all of the following:

The names, if known, in alphabetical order of surname, and last known addresses, if any, of apparent owners of escheated and abandoned property as of June 30 of that year.

The names and addresses of the holders of the abandoned property.

A statement that claim and proof of legal entitlement to escheated or abandoned property shall be presented by the owner to the Treasurer, which statement shall set forth where further information may be obtained.The Treasurer shall send the list to the Administrative Office of the Courts as soon as possible after June 30 of each year but no later than July 31, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall distribute the list to each clerk of superior court as soon as possible after receiving it but no later than August 31.

At the time the lists are distributed to the clerks of superior court, but no later than August 31 of each year, the Treasurer shall cause to be published once each week for two consecutive weeks, in at least two newspapers having general circulation in this State, a notice stating the nature of the lists and that the lists are available for inspection at the offices of the respective clerks of superior court, together with any other information the Treasurer deems appropriate to appear in the notice.

The Treasurer is not required to include in any list any item of a value, as determined by the Treasurer, in the Treasurer’s discretion, of less than fifty dollars ($50.00), unless the Treasurer deems inclusion of items of lesser amounts to be in the public interest.

The clerks of superior court shall make the lists available for public inspection.

The lists prepared by the Treasurer shall include only escheated and abandoned property reported for the current reporting date and are not required to be cumulative lists of escheated and abandoned property previously reported.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes, any supporting data, including aging reports, or lists of apparent owners of unclaimed property held by a clerk of superior court or any other office of State or local government may be confidential but shall be disclosed to the Treasurer in accordance with the reporting of escheated and abandoned property. The supporting data and lists of apparent owners of escheated and abandoned property held by the Treasurer may be confidential until 12 months after the list to the clerks of superior court required by subsection (b) of this section has been distributed. This subsection shall not apply to owners of reported property making inquiries about their property to the Escheat Fund.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1981, c. 531, ss. 9-13; 1983, c. 204, ss. 4-7; 1985, c. 215, s. 4; 1987, c. 163, ss. 4, 5; 1999-460, s. 6; 2009-312, s. 1; 2010-97, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-312, s. 1, effective October 1, 2009, and applicable to agreements entered into on or after that date, in subsection (a), in the introductory language, inserted “annually in an electronic format to the Administrative Office of the Courts to be distributed” and deleted “prior to June 30 of each year” following “each county” in the first sentence, and added “all of the following” at the end of the second sentence; in subdivision (a)(1), added “as of June 30 of that year” at the end, and made related changes; and added the last paragraph; in subsection (b), inserted “but no later than August 31 of each year”; in subsection (d), substituted “make the lists” for “retain the lists on permanent file in their offices and shall make them”; and rewrote subsection (f).

Session Laws 2010-97, s. 10, effective July 20, 2010, in subsection (f), substituted “any supporting data, including aging reports, or lists” for “the supporting data and lists” in the first sentence and substituted “12 months” for “six months” in the second sentence.

§ 116B-63.
Custody by State; recovery by holder; defense of holder.

In this section, payment or delivery is made in “good faith” if all of the following apply:

Payment or delivery was made in a reasonable attempt to comply with this Chapter.

The holder was not then in breach of a fiduciary obligation with respect to the property and had a reasonable basis for believing, based on the facts then known, that the property was presumed abandoned.

There is no showing that the records under which the payment or delivery was made did not meet reasonable commercial standards of practice.

Upon payment or delivery of property to the Treasurer, the State assumes custody and responsibility for the safekeeping of the property. A holder who pays or delivers property to the Treasurer in good faith is relieved of all liability arising thereafter with respect to the property.

A holder who has paid money to the Treasurer pursuant to this Chapter may subsequently make payment to a person reasonably appearing to the holder to be entitled to payment. Upon a filing with the Treasurer by the holder on a form prescribed by the Treasurer of proof of payment and proof that the payee was entitled to the payment, the Treasurer shall promptly reimburse the holder for the payment without imposing a fee or other charge. If reimbursement is sought for a payment made on a negotiable instrument, including a traveler’s check or money order, the holder must be reimbursed upon filing proof with the Treasurer that the instrument was duly presented and that payment was made to a person who reasonably appeared to be entitled to payment. The holder must be reimbursed for payment made even if the payment was made to a person whose claim was barred under G.S. 116B-71(a).

A holder who has delivered property other than money to the Treasurer pursuant to this Chapter may reclaim the property if it is still in the possession of the Treasurer, without paying any fee or other charge, upon filing proof that the apparent owner has claimed the property from the holder.

(d1)

A holder who has in good faith paid or delivered property to the Treasurer in error may request a refund from the Treasurer. Upon a filing with the Treasurer by the holder of proof of the error on a form prescribed by the Treasurer, the Treasurer may refund the holder.

The Treasurer may accept a holder’s affidavit as sufficient proof of the holder’s right to recover money and property under this section.

If a holder pays or delivers property to the Treasurer in good faith and thereafter another person claims the property from the holder or another state claims the money or property under its laws relating to escheat or abandoned or unclaimed property, the Treasurer, upon written notice of the claim, shall defend the holder against the claim and indemnify the holder against any liability on the claim resulting from payment or delivery of the property to the Treasurer.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1989, c. 114, s. 3; 1999-460, s. 6; 2020-48, s. 3.7(a).

§ 116B-64.
Loss, income, or gain accruing after payment or delivery.

If property other than money is delivered to the Treasurer under this Chapter, the owner is entitled to receive from the Treasurer any income or gain realized or accruing on the property at or before liquidation or conversion of the property into money. If the property is interest-bearing or pays dividends, the interest or dividends shall be paid until the date on which the amount of the deposits, accounts, or funds, or the shares must be remitted or delivered to the Treasurer under

G.S. 116B-61

. Otherwise, when property is delivered or paid to the Treasurer, the Treasurer shall hold the property without liability for loss, income, or gain.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1999-460, s. 6; 2020-48, s. 3.3.

§ 116B-65.
Public sale of abandoned property.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Treasurer, within five years after the receipt of abandoned property, shall sell it to the highest bidder at public sale at a location in the State which in the judgment of the Treasurer affords the most favorable market for the property. The Treasurer may decline the highest bid and reoffer the property for sale if the Treasurer considers the bid to be insufficient. The Treasurer need not offer the property for sale if the Treasurer considers that the probable cost of sale will exceed the proceeds of the sale. The Treasurer shall give reasonable notice of the sale as he or she deems appropriate and cost-effective, but, at a minimum, notice must be published at least two times a year in a major newspaper in the State’s major media markets. The Treasurer is not required to sell money unless it is a collector’s species having value greater than the face value of the money as cash.

Securities listed on an established stock exchange must be sold at prices prevailing on the exchange at the time of sale. Other securities may be sold over the counter at prices prevailing at the time of sale or by any reasonable method selected by the Treasurer. If securities are sold by the Treasurer before the expiration of three years after their delivery to the Treasurer, a person making a claim under this Chapter before the end of the three-year period is entitled to the proceeds of the sale of the securities or the market value of the securities at the time the claim is made, whichever is greater, less any deduction for expenses of sale. A person making a claim under this Chapter after the expiration of the three-year period is entitled to receive the securities delivered to the Treasurer by the holder, if they still remain in the custody of the Treasurer, or the net proceeds received from sale, and is not entitled to receive any appreciation in the value of the property occurring after delivery to the Treasurer, except in a case of intentional misconduct by the Treasurer.

A purchaser of property at a sale conducted by the Treasurer pursuant to this Chapter takes the property free of all claims of the owner or previous holder and of all persons claiming through or under them. The Treasurer shall execute all documents necessary to complete the transfer of ownership.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1999-460, s. 6; 2011-230, s. 5; 2021-13, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-230, s. 5, effective October 1, 2011, rewrote the next-to-last sentence of subsection (a), which formerly read: “A sale held under this section must be preceded by a single publication of notice, at least three weeks before sale, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the property is to be sold.”

Session Laws 2021-13, s. 1, effective April 27, 2021, substituted “five years” for “three years” in subsection (a).

§ 116B-66.
Claim of another state to recover property.

After property has been paid or delivered to the Treasurer under this Article, another state may recover the property if:

The property was paid or delivered to the custody of this State because the records of the holder did not reflect a last known location of the apparent owner within the borders of the other state, and the other state establishes that the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property was last known to be located within the borders of that state and under the laws of that state the property has escheated or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

The property was paid or delivered to the custody of this State because the laws of the other state did not provide for the escheat or custodial taking of the property, and under the laws of that state subsequently enacted, the property has escheated or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

The records of the holder were erroneous in that they did not accurately identify the owner of the property and the last known location of the owner within the borders of another state, and under the laws of that state the property has escheated or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state; or

Repealed by Session Laws 2000, c. 140, s. 27, effective July 21, 2000.

The property is a sum payable on a traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument that was purchased in the other state and delivered into the custody of this State under G.S. 116B-56(a)(6), and under the laws of the other state, the property has escheated or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state.

A claim of another state to recover escheated or abandoned property must be presented in a form prescribed by the Treasurer, who shall decide the claim within 90 days after it is presented. The Treasurer shall allow the claim upon determining that the other state is entitled to the abandoned property under subsection (a) of this section.

The Treasurer shall require another state, before recovering property under this section, to agree to indemnify this State and its officers and employees against any liability on a claim to the property.

History.

1999-460, s. 6; 2000-140, s. 27.

§ 116B-67.
Claim for property paid or delivered to the Treasurer.

A person, excluding another state, claiming property paid or delivered to the Treasurer may file a claim on a form prescribed by the Treasurer and verified by the claimant if the amount claimed exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000). For all other claims, the Unclaimed Property Division may pay the rightful owner upon verification of ownership by the Treasurer.

At the discretion of the Treasurer, the claim shall be made to the holder or to the holder’s successor. If the holder is satisfied that the claim is valid and that the claimant is the owner of the property, the holder shall so certify to the Treasurer by written statement attested by the holder under oath, or in the case of a corporation, by two principal officers, or one principal officer and an authorized employee of the corporation. The determination of the holder that the claimant is the owner shall, in the absence of fraud, be binding upon the Treasurer and upon receipt of the certificate of the holder to this effect, the Treasurer shall forthwith authorize and make payment of the claim or return of the property, or if the property has been sold, the amount received from the sale, to the owner, or to the holder in the event the owner has assigned the claim to the holder and the certificate of the holder is accompanied by an assignment. In the event the holder rejects the claim, the claimant may appeal to the Treasurer.If the holder, or the holder’s successor, is not available, the owner may file a claim with the Treasurer on a form prescribed by the Treasurer. In addition to any other information, the claim shall state the facts surrounding the unavailability of the holder and the lack of a successor.

Within 90 days after a claim is filed, the Treasurer shall allow or deny the claim and give written notice of the decision to the claimant. If the claim is denied, the Treasurer shall inform the claimant of the reasons for the denial and specify what additional evidence is required before the claim will be allowed. The claimant may then file a new claim with the Treasurer or maintain an action under

G.S. 116B-68

.

Within 30 days after a claim is allowed, the property or the net proceeds of a sale of the property must be delivered or paid by the Treasurer to the claimant.

The claimant or claimants and the holder, if the holder either certifies that the claimant is the owner under subsection (b) of this section or recovers money and property from the Treasurer under

G.S. 116B-63

, shall agree to indemnify, save harmless, and defend the State, the Treasurer, and the Escheat Fund from any claim arising out of or in connection with refund of the property claimed. In like manner, the claimant shall also agree to indemnify, save harmless, and defend the holder, if the holder certifies the claim under subsection (b) of this section or pays or delivers property to the claimant under

G.S. 116B-63

. In the event that a person is not required to submit a claim on a form prescribed by the Treasurer and the claim is paid from the Escheat Fund, then it shall be presumed that the claimant has agreed to indemnify, save harmless, and defend the State, the Treasurer, and the Escheat Fund from any claim arising out of or in connection with refund of the property claimed.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1987, c. 163, s. 8; c. 827, s. 18; 1999-460, s. 6; 2020-80, s. 2.6(a), (b); 2021-3, s. 2.16; 2021-13, s. 2.

§ 116B-68.
Action to establish claim.

A person aggrieved by a decision of the Treasurer or whose claim has not been acted upon within 90 days after its filing may maintain an original action to establish the claim in the Superior Court of Wake County, naming the Treasurer as a defendant.

History.

1999-460, s. 6.

§ 116B-69.
Election to take payment or delivery.

The Treasurer may decline to receive property reported under this Chapter which the Treasurer considers to have a value less than the expenses of notice and sale.

A holder, with the written consent of the Treasurer and upon conditions and terms prescribed by the Treasurer, may report and deliver property before the property is presumed abandoned. Property so delivered must be held by the Treasurer and is not presumed abandoned until it otherwise would be presumed abandoned under this Article.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1981, c. 531, s. 14; 1987, c. 163, ss. 6, 7; 1993, c. 541, s. 7; 1999-460, s. 6.

§ 116B-70.
Destruction or disposition of property having no substantial commercial value; immunity from liability; property of historical significance.

If the Treasurer determines after investigation that property delivered under this Chapter has no substantial commercial value, the Treasurer may destroy or otherwise dispose of the property at any time. An action or proceeding may not be maintained against the State or any officer, employee, or agent of the State, both past and present, in the person’s individual and official capacity, or against the holder for or on account of an act of the Treasurer under this subsection, except for intentional misconduct.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 116B-65

, the Treasurer may retain any tangible property delivered to the Treasurer, if the property has recognized historic significance. The historic significance shall be certified by the Treasurer, with the advice of the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources; and a statement of the appraised value of the property shall be filed with the certification. Historic property retained under this subsection may be stored and displayed at any suitable location.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1999-460, s. 6; 2015-68, s. 2; 2015-241, s. 14.30(t); 2017-134, s. 1(a).

§ 116B-71.
Periods of limitation.

The expiration, before or after the effective date of this Article, of a period of limitation on the owner’s right to receive or recover property, whether specified by contract, statute, or court order, does not preclude the property from being presumed abandoned or affect a duty of a holder to file a report or to pay or deliver or transfer property to the Treasurer as required by this Article.

An action or proceeding may not be maintained by the Treasurer to enforce this Article in regard to the reporting, delivery, or payment of property more than five years after the holder filed a report with the Treasurer in which the holder specifically identified property, should have but failed to identify property, or gave express notice to the Treasurer of a dispute regarding property. In the absence of such a report or other express notice, the period of limitation is tolled. The period of limitation is also tolled by the filing of a report that is fraudulent.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1993, c. 541, s. 8; 1999-460, s. 6.

§ 116B-72.
Requests for reports and examination of records.

The Treasurer may require a person who has not filed a report, or a person who the Treasurer believes has filed an inaccurate, incomplete, or false report, to file a verified report in a form specified by the Treasurer. The report must state whether the person is holding property reportable under this Chapter, describe property not previously reported or as to which the Treasurer has made inquiry, and specifically identify and state the value of property that may be in issue.

The Treasurer, at reasonable times and upon reasonable notice, may examine the records of any person to determine whether the person has complied with this Chapter. The Treasurer may conduct the examination even if the person believes it is not in possession of any property that must be reported, paid, or delivered under this Chapter. The Treasurer may contract with any other person to conduct the examination on behalf of the Treasurer.

The Treasurer at reasonable times may examine the records of an agent, including a dividend disbursing agent or transfer agent, of a business association that is the holder of property presumed abandoned if the Treasurer has given the notice required by subsection (b) of this section to both the association and the agent at least 90 days before the examination.

Documents and working papers obtained or compiled by the Treasurer, or the Treasurer’s agents, employees, or designated representatives, in the course of conducting an examination are confidential, but the documents and papers may be:

Used by the Treasurer in the course of an action to collect unclaimed property or otherwise enforce this Chapter;

Used in joint examinations conducted with or pursuant to an agreement with another state, the federal government, or any other governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality;

Produced pursuant to subpoena or court order; or

Disclosed to the abandoned property office of another state for that state’s use in circumstances equivalent to those described in this subsection, if the other state is bound to keep the documents and papers confidential.

If an examination results in the disclosure of property reportable under this Chapter, the Treasurer may assess, against a holder who made a fraudulent report, the cost of the examination at the rate of two hundred dollars ($200.00) a day for each examiner, or a greater amount that is reasonable and was incurred, but the assessment may not exceed the value of the property found to be reportable. The cost of an examination made pursuant to subsection (c) of this section may be assessed only against the business association.

If a holder does not maintain the records required by

G.S. 116B-73

and the records of the holder available for the periods subject to this Chapter are insufficient to permit the preparation of a report, the Treasurer may require the holder to report and pay to the Treasurer the amount the Treasurer reasonably estimates, on the basis of any available records of the holder or by any other reasonable method of estimation, should have been, but was not reported.

Any examination under this section may include the Treasurer utilizing any and all reliable external data, including electronic databases deemed relevant by the Treasurer.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1981, c. 671, s. 18; 1999-460, s. 6; 2015-246, s. 7(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-246, s. 7(a), effective September 23, 2015, added subsection (g). For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 116B-73.
Retention of records.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a holder required to file a report under

G.S. 116B-60

shall maintain the records containing the information required to be included in the report for five years after the holder files the report, unless a shorter period is provided by rule of the Treasurer.

A business association that sells, issues, or provides to others for sale or issue in this State, traveler’s checks, money orders, or similar instruments other than third-party bank checks, on which the business association is directly liable, shall maintain a record of the instruments while they remain outstanding, indicating the state and date of issue, for three years after the holder files the report.

History.

1999-460, s. 6; 2012-187, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-187, s. 9, effective July 16, 2012, substituted “five years” for “10 years” in subsection (a).

§ 116B-74.
Discretionary precompliance review.

A holder may request the Treasurer to conduct a precompliance review of the holder’s compliance program to educate the holder’s employees on the unclaimed property laws and filing procedures and to recommend ways to facilitate the holder’s compliance with the law. Subject to the availability of staff, the Treasurer may conduct a precompliance review upon request. The Treasurer may charge the holder a precompliance review fee of up to five hundred dollars ($500.00) per day for conducting this review.

History.

1999-460, s. 6.

§ 116B-75.
Enforcement.

The Treasurer may maintain an action in this or another state to enforce this Chapter.

The Treasurer may order a person required to report, pay, or deliver property under this Chapter, or an officer or employee of the person, or a person having possession, custody, care, or control of records relevant to the matter under inquiry, or any other person having knowledge of the property or records, to (i) appear before the Treasurer, at a time and place named in the order, (ii) produce the reports and records, (iii) make the required payments, (iv) make the required delivery of property, and (v) give testimony under oath or affirmation relevant to the inquiry. For purposes of this subsection, the Treasurer may administer oaths or affirmations. If a person refuses to obey an order of the Treasurer, the Treasurer may apply to the Superior Court of Wake County for an order requiring the person to obey the order of the Treasurer. Failure to comply with the court order is punishable for contempt.

History.

1999-460, s. 6; 2020-48, s. 3.4.

§ 116B-76.
Interstate agreements and cooperation; joint and reciprocal actions with other states.

The Treasurer may enter into an agreement with another state to exchange information relating to abandoned property or its possible existence. The agreement may permit the other state, or another person acting on behalf of a state, to examine records as authorized in

G.S. 116B-72

. The Treasurer by rule may require the reporting of information needed to enable compliance with an agreement made under this section and prescribe the form.

The Treasurer may join with another state to seek enforcement of this Chapter against any person who is or may be holding property reportable under this Chapter.

At the request of another state, the Attorney General of this State may maintain an action on behalf of the other state to enforce, in this State, the unclaimed property laws of the other state against a holder of property subject to escheat or a claim of abandonment by the other state, if the other state has agreed to pay expenses incurred by the Attorney General in maintaining the action.

The Treasurer may request that the attorney general of another state or another attorney commence an action in the other state on behalf of the Treasurer. With the approval of the Attorney General of this State, the Treasurer may retain any other attorney to commence an action in this State on behalf of the Treasurer. This State shall pay all expenses, including attorneys’ fees, in maintaining an action under this subsection. With the Treasurer’s approval, the expenses and attorneys’ fees may be paid from money received under this Chapter. The Treasurer may agree to pay expenses and attorneys’ fees based in whole or in part on a percentage of the value of any property recovered in the action. Any expenses or attorneys’ fees paid under this subsection may not be deducted from the amount that is subject to the claim by the owner under this Chapter.

The Treasurer is authorized to make such expenditures from the funds of the Escheat Fund as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1999-460, s. 6.

§ 116B-77.
Interest and penalties; waiver.

A holder who fails to report, pay, or deliver property within the time prescribed by this Chapter shall pay to the Treasurer interest at the rate established pursuant to this subsection on the property or value of the property from the date the property should have been reported, paid, or delivered. On or before June 1 and December 1 of each year, the Treasurer shall establish the interest rate to be in effect during the six-month period beginning on the next succeeding July 1 and January 1, respectively, after giving due consideration to current market conditions. If no new rate is established, the rate in effect during the preceding six-month period shall continue in effect. The rate established by the Treasurer may not be less than five percent (5%) per year and may not exceed sixteen percent (16%) per year.

A holder who willfully fails to report, pay, or deliver property within the time prescribed by this Chapter, or willfully fails to perform other duties imposed by this Chapter, including the duties imposed by

G.S. 116B-59

, shall pay to the Treasurer, in addition to interest as provided in subsection (a) of this section, a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day the report, payment, or delivery is withheld, or the duty is not performed, up to a maximum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus twenty-five percent (25%) of the value of any property that should have been but was not reported.

A holder who makes a fraudulent report shall pay to the Treasurer, in addition to interest as provided in subsection (a) of this section, a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day from the date a report under this Chapter was due, up to a maximum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus twenty-five percent (25%) of the value of any property that should have been but was not reported.

The Treasurer for good cause may waive, in whole or in part, interest under subsection (a) of this section and penalties under subsection (b) of this section.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1989, c. 114, s. 4; 1999-460, s. 6; 2017-134, s. 2(b).

§ 116B-78.
Agreement to locate property between property finders and owners or apparent owners.

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-312, s. 2, effective October 1, 2009, and applicable to agreements entered into on or after that date.

(a1)

Agreements Covered. —

An agreement by an owner is covered by this section if its primary purpose is to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of property that is distributable to the owner or presumed abandoned.

(a2)

Void Agreements. —

An agreement covered by this section is void and unenforceable if either of the following situations applies:

The agreement was entered into during the period commencing on the date the property was distributable to the owner and extending to a time that is 24 months after the date the property is paid or delivered to the Treasurer. This subdivision does not apply to an owner’s agreement with an attorney to file a claim or special proceeding as to identified property or contest the Treasurer’s denial of a claim or a clerk’s denial of a petition.

The agreement involves a property finder as defined in

G.S. 116B-52(11a)

, or any individual who acts as an agent for, serves as legal counsel for, or conducts business in any contractual capacity with a property finder, and the individual is also appointed as the personal representative of the owner or purported owner’s estate.

Criteria for Agreements. — An agreement covered by this section is void and unenforceable if it does not meet all of the following criteria:

Is in writing and clearly sets forth the nature of the property and the services to be rendered.

Is signed by the owner, with signature notarized.

Describes the property, which includes the type of property, the property ID held by the State Treasurer, and the name of the holder.

States that there may be other claims to the property that may reduce the share of the owner.

States the value of the property, to the extent known, before and after the fee or other compensation has been deducted.

States clearly the fees and costs for services. Total fees and costs shall be limited as follows:

For an agreement covered by this section other than one covered by

G.S. 28A-22-11

, total fees and costs shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or twenty percent (20%) of the value of the property recovered, whichever is less.

For an agreement subject to

G.S. 28A-22-11

by an heir, unknown or known but unlocated, the primary purpose of which is to locate or recover, or assist in the recovery, of a share in a decedent’s estate, or surplus funds in a special proceeding, total fees and costs shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the value of the property recovered.

Discloses that the property is being held by the North Carolina Department of State Treasurer’s Unclaimed Property Program.

Agreements with heirs, as defined in G.S. 28A-22-11, shall include a certification that the personal representative is not a person who is employed by, acts as an agent for, serves as legal counsel for, or conducts business in any contractual capacity with a property finder, as defined by

G.S. 116B-52(11a)

, who has entered into an agreement to locate property defined by the agreement.

Mineral Proceeds. — If an agreement covered by this section applies to mineral proceeds and the agreement contains a provision to pay compensation that includes a portion of the underlying minerals or any mineral proceeds not then presumed abandoned, the provision is void and unenforceable.

Means of Payment. — Any person who enters into an agreement covered by this section with an owner shall be allowed to receive cash property, but not tangible property or securities, on behalf of the owner but shall not be authorized to negotiate the check made payable to the owner. Tangible property shall be delivered to the owner by the Treasurer, and securities will be reregistered into the owner’s name.

Other Remedies. — This section does not preclude an owner from asserting that an agreement covered by this section is invalid on grounds other than as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

Registration. — A property finder shall register each calendar year with the Treasurer. The information to be required under this subsection shall include the person’s name, address, telephone number, state of incorporation or residence, as applicable, and the person’s social security or federal identification number. A registration fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) shall be paid to the Treasurer at the time of the filing of the registration information. Fees received under this subsection shall be credited to the General Fund.

Unfair Trade Practice. — In addition to rendering an agreement void and unenforceable, a failure to comply with the provisions of this section constitutes an unfair or deceptive trade practice under

G.S. 75-1.1

.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1989, c. 114, s. 6; 1999-460, s. 6; 2009-312, s. 2; 2021-157, s. 2(e).

§ 116B-78.1.
Property finder regulation and enforcement.

A property finder shall be licensed as a private investigator by the North Carolina Private Protective Services Board pursuant to Chapter 74C of the General Statutes.

A property finder shall not initiate a claim with the Treasurer at any time prior to being registered as a property finder under G.S. 116B-78(f) or prior to licensure as a private investigator. Failure to comply with this subsection may result in the denial of the property finder’s registration for a period of up to one year.

A property finder shall not initiate a claim with the Treasurer at any time prior to obtaining a valid agreement with an owner or apparent owner. Failure to comply with this section may result in the suspension of the property finder’s registration for a period of up to one year.

If a property finder enters into an agreement to locate property that does not comply with

G.S. 116B-78

, then the Treasurer may suspend the property finder’s registration for a period of up to one year.

A property finder with a suspended registration is prohibited from conducting business with the Unclaimed Property Division. Any pending or potential claims shall be denied during any period of suspension.

History.

2021-157, s. 2(f).

§ 116B-79.
Transitional provisions.

An initial report filed under this Article for property that was not required to be reported before the effective date of this Article but which is subject to this Article must include all items of property that would have been presumed abandoned during the 10-year period next preceding the effective date of this Article as if this Article had been in effect during that period.

This Article does not relieve a holder of a duty that arose before the effective date of this Article to report, pay, or deliver property. Except as otherwise provided in G.S 116B-71(b) and G.S. 116B-77(d), a holder who did not comply with the law in effect before the effective date of this Article is subject to the applicable provisions for enforcement and penalties which then existed, which are continued in effect for the purpose of this section.

History.

1999-460, s. 6.

§ 116B-80.
Rules.

The Treasurer may adopt rules necessary to carry out this Chapter.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 19; 1989, c. 114, s. 5; 1999-460, s. 6.